Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.160

Local government responsible for monitoring compliance.

Any city, town, county, special purpose district, public corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation within the state of Washington utilizing the certification by the office retains the responsibility for monitoring compliance with the programs under its jurisdiction. The office shall not be responsible for enforcement of local ordinances, rules, or regulations, however titled.

[ 1987 c 328 s 11.]